Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,149
Premium rates.

(1) No premium rate may be used until either a schedule of premium rates or methodology for determining premium rates has been filed with and approved by the director. A specific schedule of premium rates or a methodology for determining premium rates shall be established in accordance with actuarial principles for various categories of enrollees. The premium applicable to an enrollee shall not be individually determined based on the status of his or her health. The premium rates shall not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory. A certification by a qualified actuary or other qualified person acceptable to the director as to the appropriateness of the use of the methodology, based on reasonable assumptions, shall accompany the filing along with adequate supporting information.

(2) The director shall approve the schedule of premium rates or methodology for determining premium rates if the requirements of this section are met. If the director disapproves such filing, he or she shall notify the health maintenance organization. In the notice, the director shall specify the reasons for his or her disapproval. A hearing shall be conducted within thirty days after a request in writing by the person filing. If the director does not take action on such schedule or methodology within thirty days of the filing of such schedule or methodology, it shall be deemed approved.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 58.